Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1479YC (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ FLEX 1 CARE. 2 1. The department of health and human services is directed 3 to amend its administrative rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 4 provide that employees of a child care center who are sixteen 5 years of age or older may, without additional supervision, 6 provide flex care to children up to five years of age. 7 2. For purposes of this section: 8 a. âChild careâ means the same as defined in section 237A.1. 9 b. âChild care centerâ means the same as defined in section 10 237A.1. 11 c. âFlex careâ means child care provided during designated 12 nap hours and during brief periods when a child care center 13 employee who is eighteen years of age or older is not present 14 to provide supervision. 15